Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2834.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; LAKE SUPERIOR ZOOLOGICAL SOCIETY.new text end new text begin $375,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Lake Superior Zoological Society to develop educational exhibits and programs on Minnesota's history and cultural heritage. new text end